New Jersey, session 222, A5392.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Section 3 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-17) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Except as otherwise provided under sections 4 and 5 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-18 and C.2A:162-19) concerning a hearing on pretrial detention, a court shall make, pursuant to this section, a pretrial release decision for an eligible defendant without unnecessary delay, but in no case later than 48 hours after the eligible defendants commitment to jail, provided, however, that upon request of the prosecutor, the court may take additional time than established pursuant to this section if the eligible defendant is charged with any crime or offense involving the use or possession of a firearm, but the additional time provided for shall not exceed such time as is reasonably necessary for a firearms ballistic analysis to be conducted and immediately provided to the court and in no event shall exceed seven days. a.     Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the court shall order the pretrial release of the eligible defendant on personal recognizance or on the execution of an unsecured appearance bond when, after considering all the circumstances, the Pretrial Services Programs risk assessment and recommendations on conditions of release prepared pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-25), and any information that may be provided by a prosecutor or the eligible defendant, the court finds that the release would reasonably assure the eligible defendants appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, and that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process. The presumption of pretrial release pursuant to this subsection shall not apply to an eligible defendant charged with: (1) theft of or unlawful taking of a motor vehicle or receiving stolen property where the property involved is a motor vehicle if on one or more prior and separate occasions within the 90-day-period preceding the charge, the defendant was arrested for or convicted of theft of or unlawful taking of a motor vehicle; receiving stolen property where the property involved is a motor vehicle; or a crime under any statute of the United States, this State, or any other state that is substantially equivalent to any of the crimes enumerated in this subsection; or (2) aggravated assault against a law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency first-aid or medical services provider, or correctional or sheriffs personnel under subparagraphs (a), (b), (c), or (h) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:12-1 if committed during and at the scene of a civil disturbance resulting in serious bodily injury. As used in this paragraph, civil disturbance means an incidence of riot or public brawl under N.J.S.2C:33-1, disturbance of a public gathering under subsection d. of N.J.S.2C:33-2, obstructing highways or public passages under N.J.S.2C:33-7, disrupting meetings or processions under N.J.S.2C:33-8, disrupting a funeral under section 2 of P.L.2006, c.93 (C.2C:33-8.1), interference with transportation under N.J.S.2C:33-14, gang criminality under section 1 of P.L.2007, c.341 (C.2C:33-29), or dog fighting under section 1 of P.L.2015, c.85 (C.2C:33-31). b. (1) If the court does not find, after consideration, that the release described in subsection a. of this section will reasonably assure the eligible defendants appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, and that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process, the court may order the pretrial release of the eligible defendant subject to the following: (a) the eligible defendant shall not commit any offense during the period of release; (b) the eligible defendant shall avoid all contact with an alleged victim of the crime; (c) the eligible defendant shall avoid all contact with all witnesses who may testify concerning the offense that are named in the document authorizing the eligible defendants release or in a subsequent court order; and (d) any one or more non-monetary conditions as set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection. (2) The non-monetary condition or conditions of a pretrial release ordered by the court pursuant to this paragraph shall be the least restrictive condition, or combination of conditions, that the court determines will reasonably assure the eligible defendants appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, and that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process, which may include that the eligible defendant: (a) remain in the custody of a designated person, who agrees to assume supervision and to report any violation of a release condition to the court, if the designated person is able to reasonably assure the court that the eligible defendant will appear in court when required, will not pose a danger to the safety of any other person or the community and will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process; (b) maintain employment or, if unemployed, actively seek employment; (c) maintain or commence an educational program; (d) abide by specified restrictions on personal associations, place of abode, or travel; (e) report on a regular basis to a designated law enforcement agency, or other agency, or pretrial services program; (f) comply with a specified curfew; (g) refrain from possessing a firearm, destructive device, or other dangerous weapon; (h) refrain from excessive use of alcohol or any unlawful use of a narcotic drug or other controlled substance without a prescription by a licensed medical practitioner; (i) undergo available medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment, including treatment for drug or alcohol dependency, and remain in a specified institution if required for that purpose; (j) return to custody for specified hours following release for employment, schooling, or other limited purposes; (k) be placed in a pretrial home supervision capacity with or without the use of an approved electronic monitoring device.  The court may order the eligible defendant to pay all or a portion of the costs of the electronic monitoring, but the court may waive the payment for an eligible defendant who is indigent and who has demonstrated to the court an inability to pay all or a portion of the costs; or (l) satisfy any other condition that is necessary to reasonably assure the eligible defendants appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, and that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process, which shall not include any prohibition or restriction concerning manufacturing, distributing, or dispensing, or possessing or having under control with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense, marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or possession of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10. c. (1) If the court does not find, after consideration, that the release described in subsection a. or b. of this section will reasonably assure the eligible defendants appearance in court when required, the court may order the pretrial release of the eligible defendant on monetary bail, other than an unsecured appearance bond.  The court may only impose monetary bail pursuant to this subsection to reasonably assure the eligible defendants appearance.  The court shall not impose the monetary bail to reasonably assure the protection of the safety of any other person or the community or that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process or for the purpose of preventing the release of the eligible defendant. (2) If the eligible defendant is unable to post the monetary bail imposed by the court pursuant to this subsection, and for that reason remains detained in jail, the provisions of section 8 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-22) shall apply to the eligible defendant. d. (1) If the court does not find, after consideration, that the release described in subsection a., b., or c. will reasonably assure the eligible defendants appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, and that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process, the court may order the pretrial release of the eligible defendant using a combination of non-monetary conditions as set forth in subsection b. of this section, and monetary bail as set forth in subsection c. of this section. (2) If the eligible defendant is unable to post the monetary bail imposed by the court in combination with non-monetary conditions pursuant to this subsection, and for that reason remains detained in jail, the provisions of section 8 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-22) shall apply to the eligible defendant. e.     For purposes of the court's consideration for pretrial release described in this section, with respect to whether the particular method of release will reasonably assure that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process, this reasonable assurance may be deemed to exist if the prosecutor does not provide the court with information relevant to the risk of whether the eligible defendant will obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process. (cf: P.L.2025, c.256, s.2) 2. N.J.S.2C:12-1 is amended to read as follows: 2C:12-1. Assault. a. Simple assault. A person is guilty of assault if the person: (1)   Attempts to cause or purposely, knowingly or recklessly causes bodily injury to another; or (2)   Negligently causes bodily injury to another with a deadly weapon; or (3)   Attempts by physical menace to put another in fear of imminent serious bodily injury. Simple assault is a disorderly persons offense unless committed in a fight or scuffle entered into by mutual consent, in which case it is a petty disorderly persons offense. b.    Aggravated assault. A person is guilty of aggravated assault if the person: (1)   Attempts to cause serious bodily injury to another, or causes injury purposely or knowingly or under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life recklessly causes such injury; or (2)   Attempts to cause or purposely or knowingly causes bodily injury to another with a deadly weapon; or (3)   Recklessly causes bodily injury to another with a deadly weapon; or (4)   Knowingly under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life points a firearm, as defined in subsection f. of N.J.S.2C:39-1, at or in the direction of another, whether or not the actor believes it to be loaded; or (5)   Commits a simple assault as defined in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection a. of this section upon: (a)   Any law enforcement officer acting in the performance of the officers duties while in uniform or exhibiting evidence of authority or because of the officers status as a law enforcement officer; or (b)   Any paid or volunteer firefighter acting in the performance of the firefighters duties while in uniform or otherwise clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the duties of a firefighter; or (c)   Any person engaged in emergency first-aid or medical services acting in the performance of the persons duties while in uniform or otherwise clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of emergency first-aid or medical services; or (d)   Any school board member, school administrator, teacher, school bus driver, or other employee of a public or nonpublic school or school board while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the persons duties or because of the persons status as a member or employee of a public or nonpublic school or school board or any school bus driver employed by an operator under contract to a public or nonpublic school or school board while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the persons duties or because of the persons status as a school bus driver; or (e)   Any employee of the Division of Child Protection and Permanency while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the employees duties or because of the status as an employee of the division; or (f)   Any justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Superior Court, judge of the Tax Court or municipal judge while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of judicial duties or because of the status as a member of the judiciary; or (g)   Any operator of a motorbus or the operators supervisor or any employee of a rail passenger service while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the persons duties or because of the status as an operator of a motorbus or as the operators supervisor or as an employee of a rail passenger service; or (h)   Any Department of Corrections employee, county correctional police officer, juvenile correctional police officer, State juvenile facility employee, juvenile detention staff member, juvenile detention officer, probation officer or any sheriff, undersheriff, or sheriffs officer acting in the performance of the persons duties while in uniform or exhibiting evidence of the persons authority or because of the status as a Department of Corrections employee, county correctional police officer, juvenile correctional police officer, State juvenile facility employee, juvenile detention staff member, juvenile detention officer, probation officer, sheriff, undersheriff, or sheriffs officer; or (i)    Any employee, including any person employed under contract, of a utility company as defined in section 2 of P.L.1971, c.224 (C.2A:42-86) or a cable television company subject to the provisions of the Cable Television Act, P.L.1972, c.186 (C.48:5A-1 et seq.) while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the employees duties in regard to connecting, disconnecting, or repairing or attempting to connect, disconnect, or repair any gas, electric, or water utility, or cable television or telecommunication service; or (j)    Any health care worker employed by a licensed health care facility to provide direct patient care, any health care professional licensed or otherwise authorized pursuant to Title 26 or Title 45 of the Revised Statutes to practice a health care profession, except a direct care worker at a State or county psychiatric hospital or State developmental center or veterans memorial home, while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the duties of providing direct patient care or practicing the health care profession; or (k)   Any direct care worker at a State or county psychiatric hospital or State developmental center or veterans memorial home, while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the duties of providing direct patient care or practicing the health care profession, provided that the actor is not a patient or resident at the facility who is classified by the facility as having a mental illness or developmental disability; or (l)    Any employee of a store or other retail mercantile establishment while clearly identifiable as being engaged in the performance of the person's duties.  Store or other retail mercantile establishment means the same as such term is defined in N.J.S.2C:20-11.  Employee means any person who provides customer assistance, store management, visual merchandising, loss prevention or security services, whether in uniform or in plain clothes, or who acts as a cashier, salesperson, or team associate or otherwise interacts with customers for or on behalf of the store or other retail mercantile establishment; or (6)   Causes bodily injury to another person while fleeing or attempting to elude a law enforcement officer in violation of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:29-2 or while operating a motor vehicle in violation of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:20-10.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person shall be strictly liable for a violation of this paragraph upon proof of a violation of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:29-2 or while operating a motor vehicle in violation of subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:20-10 which resulted in bodily injury to another person; or (7)   Attempts to cause significant bodily injury to another or causes significant bodily injury purposely or knowingly or, under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life recklessly causes such significant bodily injury; or (8)   Causes bodily injury by knowingly or purposely starting a fire or causing an explosion in violation of N.J.S.2C:17-1 which results in bodily injury to any emergency services personnel involved in fire suppression activities, rendering emergency medical services resulting from the fire or explosion or rescue operations, or rendering any necessary assistance at the scene of the fire or explosion, including any bodily injury sustained while responding to the scene of a reported fire or explosion.  For purposes of this paragraph, emergency services personnel shall include, but not be limited to, any paid or volunteer firefighter, any person engaged in emergency first-aid or medical services and any law enforcement officer.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person shall be strictly liable for a violation of this paragraph upon proof of a violation of N.J.S.2C:17-1 which resulted in bodily injury to any emergency services personnel; or (9)   Knowingly, under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life, points or displays a firearm, as defined in subsection f. of N.J.S.2C:39-1, at or in the direction of a law enforcement officer; or (10) Knowingly points, displays or uses an imitation firearm, as defined in subsection v. of N.J.S.2C:39-1, at or in the direction of a law enforcement officer with the purpose to intimidate, threaten, or attempt to put the officer in fear of bodily injury or for any unlawful purpose; or (11) Uses or activates a laser sighting system or device, or a system or device which, in the manner used, would cause a reasonable person to believe that it is a laser sighting system or device, against a law enforcement officer acting in the performance of the officers duties while in uniform or exhibiting evidence of the officers authority.  As used in this paragraph, laser sighting system or device means any system or device that is integrated with or affixed to a firearm and emits a laser light beam that is used to assist in the sight alignment or aiming of the firearm; or (12) Attempts to cause significant bodily injury or causes significant bodily injury purposely or knowingly or, under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life, recklessly causes significant bodily injury to a person who, with respect to the actor, meets the definition of a victim of domestic violence, as defined in subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19); or (13) Knowingly or, under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life, recklessly obstructs the breathing or blood circulation of a person who, with respect to the actor, meets the definition of a victim of domestic violence, as defined in subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19), by applying pressure on the throat or neck or blocking the nose or mouth of such person, thereby causing or attempting to cause bodily injury. Aggravated assault under paragraphs (1) and (6) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the second degree; under paragraphs (2), (7), (9), and (10) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree; under paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the fourth degree; and under paragraph (5) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree if the victim suffers bodily injury, otherwise it is a crime of the fourth degree, except: any aggravated assault under subparagraph (g) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of this section shall be a crime of the third degree; [and] any aggravated assault of a law enforcement officer under subparagraph (a) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of this section resulting in serious bodily injury shall be a crime of the second degree; and any aggravated assault of a law enforcement officer, firefighter, emergency first-aid or medical services provider, or correctional or sheriffs personnel under subparagraphs (a), (b), (c), or (h) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of this section, if committed during and at the scene of a civil disturbance and resulting in serious bodily injury, shall be a crime of the first degree and shall be subject to a mandatory term of incarceration of not less than ten years with a ten-year period of parole ineligibility.  As used in this paragraph, civil disturbance means an incidence of riot or public brawl under N.J.S.2C:33-1, disturbance of a public gathering under subsection d. of N.J.S.2C:33-2, obstructing highways or public passages under N.J.S.2C:33-7, disrupting meetings or processions under N.J.S.2C:33-8, disrupting a funeral under section 2 of P.L.2006, c.93 (C.2C:33-8.1), interference with transportation under N.J.S.2C:33-14, gang criminality under section 1 of P.L.2007, c.341 (C.2C:33-29), or dog fighting under section 1 of P.L.2015, c.85 (C.2C:33-31).  Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:1-8 or any other law, a conviction for assaulting a law enforcement officer under subparagraph (a) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of this section shall not merge with a conviction for any other criminal offense. [A mandatory term of incarceration pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1997, c.117 (C.2C:43-7.2) shall not apply to a conviction for aggravated assault of a law enforcement officer under subparagraph (a) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of this section unless the assault resulted in serious bodily injury to the officer.] A person charged with aggravated assault of a law enforcement officer under subparagraph (a) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of this section resulting in serious bodily injury shall be ineligible to apply for admission to a program of supervisory treatment pursuant to the provisions of N.J.S.2C:43-12 through 2C:43-22. Aggravated assault under paragraph (8) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree if the victim suffers bodily injury; if the victim suffers significant bodily injury or serious bodily injury it is a crime of the second degree.  Aggravated assault under paragraph (11) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree.  Aggravated assault under paragraph (12) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the third degree but the presumption of non-imprisonment set forth in subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:44-1 for a first offense of a crime of the third degree shall not apply.  Aggravated assault under paragraph (13) of subsection b. of this section is a crime of the second degree. c. (1) A person is guilty of assault by auto or vessel when the person drives a vehicle or vessel recklessly and causes either serious bodily injury or bodily injury to another.  Assault by auto or vessel is a crime of the fourth degree if serious bodily injury results and is a disorderly persons offense if bodily injury results.  Proof that the defendant was operating a hand-held wireless telephone while driving a motor vehicle in violation of section 1 of P.L.2003, c.310 (C.39:4-97.3) may give rise to an inference that the defendant was driving recklessly. (2)   Assault by auto or vessel is a crime of the third degree if the person drives the vehicle while in violation of R.S.39:4-50 or section 2 of P.L.1981, c.512 (C.39:4-50.4a) and serious bodily injury results and is a crime of the fourth degree if the person drives the vehicle while in violation of R.S.39:4-50 or section 2 of P.L.1981, c.512 (C.39:4-50.4a) and bodily injury results. (3)   Assault by auto or vessel is a crime of the second degree if serious bodily injury results from the defendant operating the auto or vessel while in violation of R.S.39:4-50 or section 2 of P.L.1981, c.512 (C.39:4-50.4a) while: (a)   on any school property used for school purposes which is owned by or leased to any elementary or secondary school or school board, or within 1,000 feet of such school property; (b)   driving through a school crossing as defined in R.S.39:1-1 if the municipality, by ordinance or resolution, has designated the school crossing as such; or (c)   driving through a school crossing as defined in R.S.39:1-1 knowing that juveniles are present if the municipality has not designated the school crossing as such by ordinance or resolution. Assault by auto or vessel is a crime of the third degree if bodily injury results from the defendant operating the auto or vessel in violation of this paragraph. A map or true copy of a map depicting the location and boundaries of the area on or within 1,000 feet of any property used for school purposes which is owned by or leased to any elementary or secondary school or school board produced pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7) may be used in a prosecution under subparagraph (a) of paragraph (3) of this subsection. It shall be no defense to a prosecution for a violation of subparagraph (a) or (b) of paragraph (3) of this subsection that the defendant was unaware that the prohibited conduct took place while on or within 1,000 feet of any school property or while driving through a school crossing.  Nor shall it be a defense to a prosecution under subparagraph (a) or (b) of paragraph (3) of this subsection that no juveniles were present on the school property or crossing zone at the time of the offense or that the school was not in session. (4)   Assault by auto or vessel is a crime of the third degree if the person purposely drives a vehicle in an aggressive manner directed at another vehicle and serious bodily injury results and is a crime of the fourth degree if the person purposely drives a vehicle in an aggressive manner directed at another vehicle and bodily injury results. For purposes of this paragraph, driving a vehicle in an aggressive manner shall include, but is not limited to, unexpectedly altering the speed of the vehicle, making improper or erratic traffic lane changes, disregarding traffic control devices, failing to yield the right of way, or following another vehicle too closely. As used in this subsection, vessel means a means of conveyance for travel on water and propelled otherwise than by muscular power. d.    A person who is employed by a facility as defined in section 2 of P.L.1977, c.239 (C.52:27G-2) who commits a simple assault as defined in paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection a. of this section upon an institutionalized elderly person as defined in section 2 of P.L.1977, c.239 (C.52:27G-2) is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. e.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2001, c.443) f.     A person who commits a simple assault as defined in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection a. of this section in the presence of a child under 16 years of age at a school or community sponsored youth sports event is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. The defendant shall be strictly liable upon proof that the offense occurred, in fact, in the presence of a child under 16 years of age.  It shall not be a defense that the defendant did not know that the child was present or reasonably believed that the child was 16 years of age or older.  The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to create any liability on the part of a participant in a youth sports event or to abrogate any immunity or defense available to a participant in a youth sports event.  As used in this act, school or community sponsored youth sports event means a competition, practice, or instructional event involving one or more interscholastic sports teams or youth sports teams organized pursuant to a nonprofit or similar charter or which are member teams in a youth league organized by or affiliated with a county or municipal recreation department and shall not include collegiate, semi-professional or professional sporting events. (cf: P.L.2025, c.39, s.3) 3. This act shall take effect immediately.